Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201144-4217
Board; pool administrator; selection.

The director shall
select the board. The board shall select a pool administrator pursuant
to section 44-4223.

Laws 1985, LB 391, § 17;

Laws 1989, LB 279, § 6;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 31;

Laws 2000, LB 1253, § 21;

Laws 2011, LB73, § 1.
May 18, 2011